Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.140

Civil action—Attorney general.

(1) Civil proceedings to enforce this chapter may be brought by the attorney general against any person that:

(a) Engages in a pattern or practice of violating this chapter; or

(b) Engages in a violation of this chapter that raises an issue of significant public importance.

(2) In a civil action commenced under this section, the court may:

(a) Grant any appropriate equitable or declaratory relief, including costs and reasonable attorneys' fees, with respect to the violation of this chapter;

(b) Award all other appropriate relief, including monetary damages, to any person aggrieved by the violation; and

(c) To vindicate the public interest, assess a civil penalty:

(i) In an amount not exceeding fifty-five thousand dollars for a first violation; and

(ii) In an amount not exceeding one hundred ten thousand dollars for any subsequent violation.

(3) Upon timely application, a person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter with respect to which the civil action is commenced may intervene in such an action and may obtain appropriate relief as the person could obtain in a civil action under RCW 38.42.130 with respect to that violation, along with costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

[ 2018 c 197 s 3; 2014 c 65 s 5.]